bg-BG: Тип конструкция на тента: Фиксиран; Надуваем; Прибиращ се; Други
fi: Markiisin rakennetyyppi: Pysyvä; Täytettävä; Sisäänvedettävä; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de construção do toldo: Fixo; Insuflável; Retrátil; Outro
ja: オーニング構造の種類: 固定; インフレータブル; 格納式; その他
da: Markisekonstruktionstype: Fast; Oppustelig; Udtrækkelig; Andet
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie markízy: Opravené; Nafukovací; Sklopný; Iné
it: Tipo di costruzione della tenda da sole: Fisso; Gonfiabile; Retrattile; Altro
ro-RO: Tip construcție copertină: Fixă; Gonflabilă; Retractabilă; Altele
fr: Type de construction d’auvent: Fixé; Gonflable; Rétractable; Autre
cs: Typ konstrukce markýzy: Pevný; Nafukovací; Zatahovací; Jiné
th: ประเภทการก่อสร้างกันสาด: แบบแช่น้ำยารักษาสภาพ; เติมลม; แบบพับเก็บได้; อื่นๆ
ko: 어닝 시공형: 고정; 공기주입식; 개폐식; 기타
el: Τύπος κατασκευής τέντας: Σταθερή; Φουσκωτή; Ανασυρόμενη; Άλλο
vi: Kiểu nhà có mái hiên: Cố định; Lốp bơm hơi; Có thể thu vào; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de construção do toldo: Fixo; Inflável; Retrátil; Outro
zh-CN: 遮阳篷结构类型: 固定; 膨胀; 可伸缩; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta konstrukcije tende: Fiksno; Napihljivo; Izvlečno; Drugo
en: Awning construction type: Fixed; Inflatable; Retractable; Other
sv: Markistyp: Fast; Uppblåsbar; Hopfällbart; Övrigt
tr: Tente yapım türü: Sabit; Şişirilebilir; Geri çekilebilir; Diğer
es: Tipo de construcción del toldo: Fijo; Inflable; Retráctil; Otros
hu: Napellenző típusa: Rögzített; Felfújható; Visszahúzható; Egyéb
nl: Bouwtype luifel: Vast; Opblaasbaar; Uitschuifbaar; Andere
zh-TW: 遮篷結構類型: 固定; 充氣式; 可伸縮; 其他
de: Bauart der Markise: Befestigt; Aufblasbar; Einklappbar; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Markizės konstrukcijos tipas: Pritvirtintas; Pripučiamas; Ištraukiamas; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta konstrukcije tende: Fiksna; Na napuhavanje; Na uvlačenje; Ostalo
ru: Конструкция маркизы: Фиксированный; Надувной; Раздвижной; Другой
pl: Typ konstrukcji markizy: Stałe; Nadmuchiwana; Zwijany; Inne
nb: Konstruksjonstype for markise: Fast; Oppblåsbar; Uttrekkbar; Annet